Utah statutes.
58-1-505.   Cosmetic medical procedure supervisor.

(1)  For purposes of this section and Section 58-1-506:

(a)  "Cosmetic medical facility" means a physician's office or a facility that has a supervisor who performs the supervision required in Section 58-1-506.

(b)  "Supervisor" means:

(i)  a physician with an unrestricted license under Chapter 67, Utah Medical Practice Act, or Chapter 68, Utah Osteopathic Medical Practice Act, who is acting within the scope of the practice of medicine, as defined in Section 58-67-102; and

(ii)  an advanced practice registered nurse with an unrestricted license under Chapter 31b, Nurse Practice Act, who is acting within the scope of practice of advanced practice registered nursing, as defined in Section 58-31b-102.

(2) (a)  An individual authorized by this title to perform a cosmetic medical procedure shall be supervised by a supervisor when performing a medical procedure.

(b)  Cosmetic medical procedures may only be performed in a cosmetic medical facility.

(c)  A supervisor may delegate the supervisory role only to another individual who is qualified as a supervisor.



Enacted by Chapter 362, 2012 General Session

